Massachusetts, session 194th, H1210.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 70E of Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 46, subsection (b), and inserting in 
place thereof the following language;  
(b) to confidentiality of all records and communications to the extent provided by law;  
(b ½) to be informed, if the information they are receiving either verbally or in writing 
has been generated by artificial intelligence, and to be provided with instructions about how to 
contact a human healthcare provider in the event that such information was not previously 
reviewed and approved by their provider;  
SECTION 2. Section 6 of Chapter 176O of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after subsection (9) the following:  

of 2 11  (9 ½) a disclosure if artificial intelligence algorithms or automated decision tools are 
being utilized or will be utilized in the claims review process, such a disclosure must include a 
summary of what tools are being used and how they are being used throughout the claims review 
process;  
SECTION 3. Section 12 of Chapter 176O of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following subsection:  
(g) A carrier shall submit to the division of insurance, no later than December 31 each 
year, a form to be prescribed by the division, which shall detail the artificial intelligence 
algorithms and data training sets that are currently being used or will be used in the utilization 
review process by the carrier. A carrier shall also submit an attestation, in a manner and form 
prescribed by the division, that such algorithms and training data sets have minimized the risk of 
bias based on the covered person's race, color, religious creed, ancestry, age, sex, gender, 
national origin, handicap or disability, and adhere to evidence-based clinical guidelines.